src-fst-morphology-affixes-nouns.lexc.md
# Noun inflection

Nouns in ERZYA inflect for number, case and declension (definite, indefinite and possessive).

LEXICON N_PELE  пеле:пель, ало:ал

## KINSHIP 

## HUMAN 

## PLACE 

## LATIVE 

## VOCATIVE

## NAMES OF MONTHS

## COMMON NOUNS 

* LEXICON N_T1  кель:кель %^Ь2ZERO

* LEXICON N_KEL1  кель:кель %^Ь2ZERO

* LEXICON N_LOMAN1  ломань:ломань %^Ь2ZERO

* LEXICON N_OZIM1  озимь:озимь %^Ь2ZERO

* LEXICON N_RUF1  озимь:озимь %^Ь2ZERO

* LEXICON N_RECH1  озимь:озимь %^Ь2ZERO

* LEXICON N_VESHCH1  озимь:озимь %^Ь2ZERO

* LEXICON N_PEJ  кель:кель %^Ь2ZERO
* LEXICON N_J  кель:кель %^Ь2ZERO

* LEXICON N_SODYJ  сода%>%{иы%}й, содый

кардаз:карда

панго:панг

потмо:пот

Front vowel, non-palatal consonant before vowel
Front vowel, non-palatal consonant before vowel

Front vowel, palatal consonant before vowel

Front vowel, non-palatal consonant before vowel
Front vowel, non-palatal consonant before vowel

Does this need a diminutive?

NMN

* LEXICON NMN_SAN  сан:сан

* LEXICON NMN_KEL1  кель:кель %^Ь2ZERO

* LEXICON NMN_LOMAN1  ломань:ломань 

* LEXICON NMN_PEJ  кель:кель %^Ь2ZERO

* ** TMP-INDEF ; ** Check this

* **LEXICON NMN_KUDO-PL ** This needs checking 2013-03-27

harmony: front

DERIVATION 

* **+SP+Gen+Indef:%>%{оеэØ%}нь%> N2Dem-SE ; ** _ь_ retension through double %>%>

* **+Sg+Gen+Def:%>%{оеэØ%}нть%> N2Dem-SE ; ** _ь_ retension through double %>%>
* **+Sg+Ela+Def:%>ст%{оэØ%}%>нть%> N2Dem-SE ; ** _ь_ retension through double %>%>
* **+Sg+Ine+Def:%>с%{оэØ%}%>нть%> N2Dem-SE ; ** _ь_ retension through double %>%>
* **+Sg+Prl+Def:%>Г2а%>нть%> N2Dem-SE ; ** _ь_ retension through double %>%>
* **+Sg+Cmpr+Def:%>%{оеэØ%}шка%>нть%> N2Dem-SE ; ** _ь_ retension through double %>%>
* **+Sg+Abe+Def:%>вт%{оеэ%}мО1%>нть%> N2Dem-SE ; ** _ь_ retension through double %>%>
* **+Sg+Abe+Def+Err/Orth-stem-soft-should-be-0:%^SoftRetain%>темО1%>нть%> N2Dem-SE ; ** _ь_ retension through double %>%>
* **+Use/-Spell+Sg+Gen+Def+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/NW:%>сть%> N2Dem-SE ; ** _ь_ retension through double %>%>
* **+Use/-Spell+Sg+Ela+Def+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/NW:%>ст%{оэØ%}%>сть%> N2Dem-SE ; ** _ь_ retension through double %>%>
* **+Use/-Spell+Sg+Ine+Def+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/NW:%>с%{оэØ%}%>сть%> N2Dem-SE ; ** _ь_ retension through double %>%>
* **+Use/-Spell+Sg+Prl+Def+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/NW:%>Г2а%>сть%> N2Dem-SE ; ** _ь_ retension through double %>%>
* **+Use/-Spell+Sg+Cmpr+Def+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/NW:%>%{оеэØ%}шка%>сть%> N2Dem-SE ; ** _ь_ retension through double %>%>
* **+Use/-Spell+Sg+Abe+Def+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/NW:%>вт%{оеэ%}мО1%>%>сть%> N2Dem-SE ; ** _ь_ retension through double %>%>
* **+Use/-Spell+Sg+Abe+Def+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/NW+Err/Orth-stem-soft-should-be-0:%^SoftRetain%>темО1%>%>сть%> N2Dem-SE ; ** _ь_ retension through double %>%>
* **+Pl+Gen+Def:%>тнЕ3%>нь%> N2Dem-SE ; ** _ь_ retension through double %>%>

* **+SP+Gen+Indef:%^Ь2ZERO%>ень%> N2Dem-SE ; ** _ь_ retension through double %>%>

* **+Sg+Gen+Def:%^Ь2ZERO%>енть%> N2Dem-SE ; ** _ь_ retension through double %>%>
* **+Sg+Ela+Def:%>стэ%>нть%> N2Dem-SE ; ** _ь_ retension through double %>%>
* **+Sg+Ine+Def:%>сэ%>нть%> N2Dem-SE ; ** _ь_ retension through double %>%>
* **+Sg+Prl+Def:%>га%>нть%> N2Dem-SE ; ** _ь_ retension through double %>%>
* **+Sg+Cmpr+Def:%^Ь2ZERO%>ешка%>нть%> N2Dem-SE ; ** _ь_ retension through double %>%>
* **+Sg+Abe+Def:%>теме%>нть%> N2Dem-SE ; ** _ь_ retension through double %>%>
* **+Use/-Spell+Sg+Gen+Def+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/NW:%>сть%> N2Dem-SE ; ** _ь_ retension through double %>%>
* **+Use/-Spell+Sg+Ela+Def+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/NW:%>стэ%>сть%> N2Dem-SE ; ** _ь_ retension through double %>%>
* **+Use/-Spell+Sg+Ine+Def+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/NW:%>сэ%>сть%> N2Dem-SE ; ** _ь_ retension through double %>%>
* **+Use/-Spell+Sg+Prl+Def+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/NW:%>га%>сть%> N2Dem-SE ; ** _ь_ retension through double %>%>
* **+Use/-Spell+Sg+Cmpr+Def+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/NW:%^Ь2ZERO%>ешка%>сть%> N2Dem-SE ; ** _ь_ retension through double %>%>
* **+Use/-Spell+Sg+Abe+Def+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/NW:%>теме%>%>сть%> N2Dem-SE ; ** _ь_ retension through double %>%>
* **+Pl+Gen+Def:%>тне%>нь%> N2Dem-SE ; ** _ь_ retension through double %>%>

* **+SLoss+Sg+Ela+Def:%>SLossст%{оэØ%}%>нть%> N2Dem-SE ; ** _ь_ retension through double %>%>
* **+SLoss+Sg+Ine+Def:%>SLossс%{оэØ%}%>нть%> N2Dem-SE ; ** _ь_ retension through double %>%>
* **+SLoss+Sg+Ela+Def+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/NW:%>SLossст%{оэØ%}%>сть%> N2Dem-SE ; ** _ь_ retension through double %>%>
* **+SLoss+Sg+Ine+Def+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/NW:%>SLossс%{оэØ%}%>сть%> N2Dem-SE ; ** _ь_ retension through double %>%>

* **+Sg+Ela+Def+Use/NG:%>%{оеэØ%}%>ст%{оэØ%}%>нть%> N2Dem-SE ; ** _ь_ retension through double %>%>
* **+Sg+Ine+Def+Use/NG:%>%{оеэØ%}%>с%{оэØ%}%>нть%> N2Dem-SE ; ** _ь_ retension through double %>%>
* **+Sg+Ela+Def+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/NW:%>%{оеэØ%}%>ст%{оэØ%}%>сть%> N2Dem-SE ; ** _ь_ retension through double %>%>
* **+Sg+Ine+Def+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/NW:%>%{оеэØ%}%>с%{оэØ%}%>сть%> N2Dem-SE ; ** _ь_ retension through double %>%>

* **+SP+Gen+Indef:%>%{оеэØ%}нь%> N2Dem-SE ; ** _ь_ retension through double %>%>

pango:pang

N_KUDO-Def-Declension

N_KUDO-Def-Declension

N_KUDO-Def-Declension

## Plurale tantum

## DEFINITE SINGULAR TAGS 

* Noun singular nominative definite examples:*
* *калось:* `кал+N+Sg+Nom+Def`
* *калоськак:* `кал+N+Sg+Nom+Def+Foc/Гак`
* ★*калосьгак:* `кал+N+Sg+Nom+Def+Foc/Гак` (is not standard language)

* Noun singular nominative definite examples:*
* *паксясось:* `пакся+N+SP+Ine+Indef+Der+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Def`
* *паксясоськак:* `пакся+N+SP+Ine+Indef+Der+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Def+Foc/Add`
* ★*паксясосьгак:* `пакся+N+SP+Ine+Indef+Der+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Def+Foc/Add` (is not standard language)

* Noun singular genitive definite examples:*
* *калонть:* `кал+N+Sg+Gen+Def`
* *калонтькак:* `кал+N+Sg+Gen+Def+Foc/Гак`

* **+Sg+Ine+Def:%>с%{оэØ%}%>н%> N2Dem-SE ; **  !коридорсонсесь 2022-02-10

## INDEFINITE DECLENSION

SG-NOM-INDEF_LAK ;

SG-NOM-INDEF_KAL ;

SG-NOM-INDEF_OSH ;

* ** TMP-INDEF ; ** Check this

## INDEFINITE TAGS

* Noun singular nominative definite examples:*
* *калдо:* `кал+N+SP+Abl+Indef`
* *калдояк:* `кал+N+SP+Abl+Indef+Foc/Гак`

## POSSESSIVE DECLENSION 

## CASES BEFORE POSSESSIVE TAGS 

## DEFINITE PLURAL

## Cases for тнэ

NP head ellipsis declension, Modifiers without nouns = MWN

Nouns1S_A

## POSSESSIVE marking followed by clitics

Possessor indices

The Erzya language possessor indices or possessive suffixes may be followed
by a number of morpheme types

These are possessor indices that can be followed by predicate marking
in the present there is no destinction between ScSg3 and ScPl3
Possessor indices allowing (1) #, (2) Foc, (3) Der/Pr ()

This appears with kindred terminology 

Is "_KAL" necessary ?

DAT-PXPL1 ;

## POSSESSIVE TAGS 

These are possessor Indices for non-nominative singular
NonNomSg

word boundary or focus

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-myv/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc)</small>
